book/styles/hyphenation.dic
.abate3ment
.account
.actions
.ad1di3tional
.ag1greg3ate
.al1loc3a5tion
.another
.avail3able
.average
.balance
.bar1gain3ing
.because
.bene3fit
.bene3fits
.between
.borrow3ing
.busi3ness
.capital
.central
.century
.changes
.chooses
.cit3izens
.climate
.coef1fi3cient
.com3bin5a1tion
.com3pany
.com5pet1i3tion
.com5pet1it3ive
.con3di1tions
.con3sider
.con3stant
.con3straint
.con3sume
.con3sumer
.con3sumers
.con3sump1tion
.con3tract
.correct
.cor1rel5a3tion
.cor1rel5a3tions
.coun3tries
.country
.current
.decision
.defin1i3tion
.depends
.de3pres1sion
.dia3gram
.dif1fer3ence
.dif1fer3ences
.dif1ferent
.dis3tri5bu1tion
.down3ward
.earn3ings
.eco3nomic
.eco3nomics
.eco3nomies
.eco3nomists
.eco3nomy
.effects
.effi3cient
.emis3sion
.emis3sions
.em1ploy3ees
.em1ployer
.em1ployers
.em1ploy3ment
.en1dow3ment
.en3vir1on5ment
.en3vir1on5mental
.equi3lib1rium
.example
.ex3change
.exer3cise
.ex1pec3ted
.explain
.ex1ternal
.farm1ers
.feas1ible
.feed1back
.fin1an3cial
.follow3ing
.frontier
.func1tion
.further
.germany
.gov1ern3ment
.gov1ern3ments
.greater
.high1est
.hori3zontal
.house3hold
.house3holds
.how3ever
.im1port3ant
.includ3ing
.incomes
.increase
.in1creased
.in1creases
.in1creasing
.in1differ3ence
.indi3vidual
.indi3viduals
.indus3trial
.in1equal3ity
.in1flation
.in1form5a3tion
.innov3a5tion
.instead
.insti3tu5tions
.in1sur3ance
.interest
.in1tergen7er3a5tional
.inter5na3tional
.invest3ment
.iso3cost
.iso3profit
.macro5eco3nomic
.mar1ginal
.markets
.measure
.mul1ti3plier
.national
.neg3ative
.op1por5tun3ity
.options
.out1come
.phillips
.poli1cies
.policy3makers
.polit3ical
.pop5u1la3tion
.pos1it3ive
.possible
.pref1er3ence
.pref1er3ences
.private
.problem
.problems
.process
.produce
.produced
.produc1ing
.product
.pro1duc3tion
.pro1ductiv3ity
.products
.profits
.project
.property
.provide
.quality
.quantity
.question
.receive
.re1cession
.re3la1tion3ship
.relative
.reser3va1tion
.resources
.response
.revenue
.re1volu3tion
.section
.sellers
.selling
.services
.setting
.similar
.situ1ation
.some3times
.spend1ing
.standards
.state1ments
.strategy
.students
.sub3sti5tu1tion
.summary
.suppose
.surplus
.tech3no5lo1gical
.tech3no5lo1gies
.tech3no1logy
.there1fore
.through
.together
.under1stand
.un1employed
.un1employ3ment
.uni3ver1sity
.ver1tical
.whether
.willing
.without
.workers
.working
